Hawaii statutes.
[§707-712.6] Assault against a law
enforcement officer in the second degree. (1) A person commits the
offense of assault against a law enforcement officer in the second degree if
the person recklessly causes bodily injury to a law enforcement officer who is
engaged in the performance of duty.

(2) Assault of a law enforcement officer in
the second degree is a misdemeanor. The court shall sentence the person who
has been convicted of this offense to a definite term of imprisonment, pursuant
to section 706-663, of not less than thirty days without possibility of
probation or suspension of sentence. [L 2003, c 66, §1]

Cross References

Definition of law enforcement officer, see §701-118.

COMMENTARY ON §707-712.6

Act 66, Session Laws 2003, added this section, creating the
misdemeanor offense of assault against a law enforcement officer in the second
degree. The legislature expressed the intent that the term "law
enforcement officer" includes, but is not limited to, police officers,
sheriffs, sheriff deputies, department of land and natural resources
enforcement officers, and investigators with the department of the attorney
general. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 979.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next